Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.394

University tract—Powers of regents—Agreements to pay for governmental services.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the board of regents of the University of Washington by RCW 28B.20.395, the board of regents is authorized and shall have the power to enter into an agreement or agreements with the city of Seattle and the county of King, Washington, to pay to the city and the county such sums as shall be mutually agreed upon for governmental services rendered to the university tract, which sums shall not exceed the amounts that would be received pursuant to limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.043 by the city of Seattle and county of King respectively from real and personal property taxes paid on the university tract or any leaseholds thereon if such taxes could lawfully be levied.

[ 1999 c 346 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 10; 1972 ex.s. c 107 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.394. See also 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 140. Prior: 1955 c 229 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.361.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—Effective date—1999 c 346: See notes following RCW 28B.20.381.

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.